Utah statutes.
17-28-7.   Examinations.

(1)  A person may not be appointed to any civil service position as a firefighter in any fire department subject to the provisions of this chapter until he has successfully passed an examination and been certified as eligible for consideration by the County Fire Civil Service executive director, except that any honorably discharged veteran of the United States military service shall receive preferential employment consideration for entry into the County Fire Civil Service System.

(2)  All examinations shall be public, competitive, and free and fairly test the ability of persons to discharge the duties of the position.

